apertium_ben_in_canonical_forms.dix
<e><p><l>aCilAmao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aCilio</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aCileo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aCilenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aCilao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>aCilenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:Cila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>eCilAmai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilii</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilenai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCiloi</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilenai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>eCilAmao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilio</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCileo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eCilenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>eiCilAma</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCili</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCile</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCilena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCila</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCilo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eiCilena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>eoCilAma</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCili</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCile</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCilena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCila</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCilo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>eoCilena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:eCila"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>aba</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abi</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:be"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>abai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abii</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abenai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abenai</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>abao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:u"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abio</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abeo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abeo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abenao</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:be"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>


<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>awei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>aweo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>e</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:e"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:e"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>eo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:e"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>A</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:A"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Ai</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:A"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Ao</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:A"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Ara</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:Ara"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Arai</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:Ara"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>Arao</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:Ara"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>abAra</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:bAra"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>abArai</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:bAra"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>abArao</l><r>a<s n="cat:vn"/><s n="tam:bAra"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>ale</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:le"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>alei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:le"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>aleo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:le"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>awe</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>awei</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/><s n="emp:i"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>aweo</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="tam:we"/><s n="emp:o"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>a</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>uka</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>una</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:a_h"/><s n="tam:subj"/></r></p></e>

<e><p><l>isa</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h0"/><s n="tam:imper_fut"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>o</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h1"/><s n="tam:imper_fut"/></r></p></e>
<e><p><l>abena</l><r>a<s n="cat:v"/><s n="per:m_h2"/><s n="tam:imper_fut"/></r></p></e>


</pardef>
<pardef n="prawyaya">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prawyaya"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="parsarg">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:prsg"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="conjunct">
<e><p><l></l><r><s n="cat:cnj"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<e lm="0~{na._e._pu._ba.}"><i>0~{na._e._pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_anusAra"><i>0~ke_anusAra</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_pahalekA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_pahalekA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_bAhara_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_bAhara_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="purA+0"><i>purA+0</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWakA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_sAWakA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_bAre_meM_hE-jo-vaha{swrI._e.}"><i>0~ke_bAre_meM_hE-jo-vaha{swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="kA~{swrI._e._na._ba.}"><i>kA~{swrI._e._na._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI_jagaha_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~kI_jagaha_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI_yogyawA_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~kI_yogyawA_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI~ora_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~kI~ora_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~kI_KAwira"><i>0~kI_KAwira</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{2_ba.}"><i>yA~WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>yA~hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{2_ba.}"><i>yA~WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~WA{3_swrI._e.}"><i>yA~WA{3_swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM+yA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}"><i>nahIM+yA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~hE{1_ba.}"><i>yA~hE{1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~jEsA"><i>yA~jEsA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_meM_kA{swrI._e.}"><i>0~ke_meM_kA{swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="na+wA~huA{"><i>na+wA~huA{</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_WA{3_pu._ba.3_na._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_WA{3_pu._ba.3_na._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~nA"><i>0~nA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="se_nirAle_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>se_nirAle_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_parekA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_parekA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wakakA{pu._ba.}"><i>wakakA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kArana_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kArana_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_lie_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_lie_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_lie_mAwra{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_lie_mAwra{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_AsapAsakA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_AsapAsakA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAmanekA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_sAmanekA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_sAWa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAWa_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_sAWa_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_sAmane_kA{swrI._ba._-}"><i>0~ke_sAmane_kA{swrI._ba._-}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_samAna_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_samAna_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_padosameM"><i>0~ke_padosameM</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_lie_hE_jo-vaha{swrI._e.}"><i>0~ke_lie_hE_jo-vaha{swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_ulatA"><i>0~ke_ulatA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="future~{+hama}"><i>future~{+hama}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~sakawA_hE"><i>0~sakawA_hE</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_WA{2_swrI._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_WA{2_swrI._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_binA_kA{pu._ba.}"><i>0~ke_binA_kA{pu._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_viroXa_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}"><i>0~ke_viroXa_kA{swrI._e._sajIva._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wA~AyA_hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>wA~AyA_hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="yA~karawA_hE{13_e.1_ba.}"><i>yA~karawA_hE{13_e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~rahA_WA{2_ba.}"><i>0~rahA_WA{2_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}_nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}"><i>nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}_nahIM+0~rAhA_hogA{3_swrI._ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="wA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}"><i>wA~rahawA_hE{1_pu._e.1_ba.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="meM~kA"><i>meM~kA</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}"><i>nA~vAlA_hE{2_pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}"><i>0~ke_kAraNa_kA{pu._e.}</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="meM_se"><i>meM<b/>se</i><par n="parsarg"/></e>
<e lm="vAlA"><i>vAlA</i><par n="prawyaya"/></e>
<e lm="Oura"><i>Oura</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
<e lm="aWavA"><i>aWavA</i><par n="conjunct"/></e>
